Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2338.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 11, chapter 6, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-820.05, to read: START_STATUTE11-820.05. Zoning; wind and solar projects; use permits; voting; applicability A. Notwithstanding any other law, in a county with a population of less than five hundred thousand persons, the board may not approve an application for a conditional use permit, special use permit or other zoning change or variance for a proposed wind project or solar project unless all of the following occur: 1. All members of the board who are entitled to vote are present for the vote. 2. A majority of the members vote to approve the application. 3. Each supervisory district where a portion of the proposed wind project or solar project is located votes to approve the application. B. If there is a vacancy on the board, the board may not vote on the application until the vacancy has been filled. C. If a board member is absent, the board may not vote on the application until all board members are present to vote. D. If a board member recuses himself and the recused member represents a district where a portion of the proposed wind project or solar project is located, the vote of all the remaining members that are eligible to vote must be unanimous.  END_STATUTE